src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_pallad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - pallađ: # MLO: pallađ and hamstrađ both checked. 
    pallađ+V+Inf: pallađ
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pallaam
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pallaah
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pallaa
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pallajeen
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pallaavettee
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pallav
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pallap
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pallaavetteđ
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pallajeh
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pallajim
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pallajih
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pallai
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pallaim
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pallaid
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pallain
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pallaim
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pallaid
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pallajii
    pallađ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pallaaččim
    pallađ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: pallaaččih
    pallađ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pallaaččij
    pallađ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: pallaaččáim
    pallađ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: pallaaččáid
    pallađ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: pallaaččáin
    pallađ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: pallaaččijm
    pallađ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: pallaaččijd
    pallađ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: pallaaččii
    pallađ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pallaažeem
    pallađ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: pallaažeeh
    pallađ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pallaš 
    pallađ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: pallaažeen
    pallađ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: pallašvettee
    pallađ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: pallaažává
    pallađ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: pallaažep
    pallađ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: pallašvetteđ
    pallađ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: pallaažeh

    pallađ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pallaa
    pallađ+V+Imprt+Sg3: pallajus
    pallađ+V+Imprt+Du1: pallajoon
    pallađ+V+Imprt+Du2: pallajee
    pallađ+V+Imprt+Du3: pallajus
    pallađ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pallajop
    pallađ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pallađ
    pallađ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pallajus
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pallaa
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pallam
    pallađ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: pallaaččii
    pallađ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pallaažii
    pallađ+V+PrsPrc: [pallajeijee, pallajijjee] 
    pallađ+V+PrfPrc: pallam
    pallađ+V+Actio+Nom: pallam
    pallađ+V+Actio+Ess: pallaamin
    pallađ+V+Actio+Loc: pallaamist
    pallađ+V+Actio+Ill: pallaamân
    pallađ+V+Ger: pallaadijn
    pallađ+V+VAbess: pallaahánnáá
    
    
  Verb - hamstrađ: # 
    hamstrađ+V+Inf: hamstrađ
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hamstraam
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: hamstraah
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hamstraa
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: hamstrajeen
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: hamstraavettee
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: hamstrav
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hamstrap
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hamstraavetteđ
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hamstrajeh
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hamstrajim
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: hamstrajih
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hamstrai
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: hamstraim
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: hamstraid
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: hamstrain
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hamstraim
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hamstraid
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hamstrajii
    hamstrađ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: hamstraaččim
    hamstrađ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: hamstraaččih
    hamstrađ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: hamstraaččij
    hamstrađ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: hamstraaččáim
    hamstrađ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: hamstraaččáid
    hamstrađ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: hamstraaččáin
    hamstrađ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: hamstraaččijm
    hamstrađ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: hamstraaččijd
    hamstrađ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: hamstraaččii
    hamstrađ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: hamstraažeem
    hamstrađ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: hamstraažeeh
    hamstrađ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: hamstraš 
    hamstrađ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: hamstraažeen
    hamstrađ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: hamstrašvettee
    hamstrađ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: hamstraažává
    hamstrađ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: hamstraažep
    hamstrađ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: hamstrašvetteđ
    hamstrađ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: hamstraažeh

    hamstrađ+V+Imprt+Sg2: hamstraa
    hamstrađ+V+Imprt+Sg3: hamstrajus
    hamstrađ+V+Imprt+Du1: hamstrajoon
    hamstrađ+V+Imprt+Du2: hamstrajee
    hamstrađ+V+Imprt+Du3: hamstrajus
    hamstrađ+V+Imprt+Pl1: hamstrajop
    hamstrađ+V+Imprt+Pl2: hamstrađ
    hamstrađ+V+Imprt+Pl3: hamstrajus
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: hamstraa
    hamstrađ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: hamstram
    hamstrađ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: hamstraaččii
    hamstrađ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: hamstraažii
    hamstrađ+V+PrsPrc: [hamstrajeijee, hamstrajijjee]
    hamstrađ+V+PrfPrc: hamstram
    hamstrađ+V+Actio+Nom: hamstram
    hamstrađ+V+Actio+Ess: hamstraamin
    hamstrađ+V+Actio+Loc: hamstraamist
    hamstrađ+V+Actio+Ill: hamstraamân
    hamstrađ+V+Ger: hamstraadijn
    hamstrađ+V+VAbess: hamstraahánnáá
    
    
    
